District of Columbia statutes.
2-220.09

Waiver.

The Mayor may exempt a recipient from the requirements of this subchapter, subject to approval by the Council. Any entity requesting a waiver shall be required to demonstrate that the provisions of this subchapter will pose a significant financial hardship on the recipient that will result in the layoff of a substantial number of employees, substantial downsizing, or the inability to meet payroll. All requests for waivers shall be written and state the rationale for the request. Any waiver granted by the Mayor shall be subject to Council review and approval, by act.

June 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-118, § 109, 53 DCR 2602